modules/nlb/book-to-pef/src/main/resources/hyph/hyph_nb_NO.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
.aa1ber
.aa1bet
.aab1n
.aab1u
.aa1chr
.aa1da1le
.aa1dan
.aada1nn
.aade1i
.aa1dr
.aad1s
.aa1en
.aae1v
.aa1fa
.aa1fj
.aa1fr
.aa1ga
.aa1ger
.aa1get
.aag1r
.aahaa1
.aa1he
.aa1ka
.aa1ker
.aa1klæ
.aa1lc
.aa1led
.aal1m
.aal1n
.aa1lse
.aa1lu
.aa1læ
.aalæn1
.aa1ma
.aa1me1
.aameg1
.aa1mi1
.aan1da
.aands1s
.aan1er
.aan1gez
.aa1nin
.aaning1
.aan1s
.aan1z
.aar1at
.aard1br
.aa1red
.aa1rei
.aare1ne
.aar1er.
.aa1rer
.aarer1n
.aa1ret.
.aa1rig
.aar1ja
.aar1n
.aa1rom
.aar1p
.aars1b
.aars1f
.aars1k
.aars1p
.1aars1sk
.aas1ak
.aas1h
.aas1k
.aas1l
.aas1m
.aa1str
.aa1ta1n
.aa1te
.aatt1a
.aat1te
.aat1v
.aau1s
.aa1vel1
.aa1vid
.aav1n
.aba1co
.abas1
.abat1t
.ab1bet
.abcr1
.abcs1
.ab1do1me
.ab1eant
.ab1eft
.abe1k
.abe1le
.abe1li
.abe1lo
.aben1b
.abes1s
.abet1
.ab1gela
.1abge
.ab1hang
.abi1a
.ab1ib
.abi1li1
.abi1ta
.abi1tum
.ab1ja
.ab1ko
.ab1lag
.ab1lass
.ab1le1ge
.ab1li
.ab1loc
.ab1lom1
.ablu1
.ab1ner
.ab1ni
.abra1h
.ab1ras
.ab1rei
.abre1n
.abro1
.ab1ruf
.ab1run
.ab1sen1c
.ab1sic
.ab1spa
.ab1spr
.ab1sta
.ab1ste
.ab1tei1l
.ab1tei
.ab1unde
.ab1ur
.abu1s
.ab1wef
.abys1
.acadé1
.aca1l
.ac1cul
.ac1ei
.acen1d
.ace1tu
.ache1v
.ach1s
.ach1ti
.ac1ide
.ac1io
.ac1ken
.ac1ns
.acon1
.ac1red.
.ac1ted
.ac1ten
.ac1ter
.ac1te1rn
.ac1teu
.ac1th
.ac1tic
.ac1t1ing
.ac1tivi
.actn1
.ac1tu1al
.ac1tum
.ac1tu1r
.acumi1
.acu1tis
.ad1aa
.ad1amp
.ad1ang
.ad1ant
.ad1be
.adc1li
.ad1debe
.ad1d1ed.
.ad1der.
.ad1det
.ad1d1in
.adding1
.ad1dun
.ade1d
.ad1efl
.ade1la
.ade1le
.ade1li
.ad1elle
.adequa1
.ade1q
.ad1e1rat
.ade1ri
.ad1eu
.ad1fa
.ad1gn
.adhi1bu
.adi1c
.ad1ier
.adi1g
.adi1ka
.ad1ili
.adi1me1
.ad1ing
.adio1
.adi1t
.ad1la
.ad1le
.ad1lig
.adl1in
.ad1ln
.ad1ls
.adm1li1
.ad1net
.adno1ju
.ado1ne
.ad1oråt
.adri1e
.ad1sch
.ad1set
.ad1ske
.ad1skj
.ad1sl
.adsorp1
.ad1spe
.ad1spo
.ad1spø
.ad1sta
.ad1stra
.ad1stu
.ad1te
.adtio1
.ad1uer
.ad1ut
.ad1ye
.adø1
.ae1br
.ae1ge
.ae1gis
.aemm1
.aen1d
.aende1
.aen2ne1s
.aen1ne
.aeno1
.ae1nom
.ae1ris
.ae1tat.
.ae1ta1te
.aeter1
.ae1tion
.aet1s
.ae1v
.af1artn
.af1brut
.afde1li
.af1dell
.af1ee
.af1ell
.afe1s
.af1fag
.af1fald
.af1fan
.affa1ri
.af1fef
.af1fer.
.af1fif
.af1fign
.aff1leg
.af1fn
.af1gift
.afham1
.af1hce
.afhcrn1
.af1hent
.afhoen1
.af1hore
.afi1am
.afi1b
.af1iin
.af1ik
.af1inn
.afio1
.af1isn
.af1laa
.af1lage
.af1lagr
.af1led
.af1len
.aflnd1h
.af1lod.
.af1lok
.af1lom
.af1lun
.afløbs1
.af1løb
.afon1
.afora1
.af1rag
.af1ras
.af1rei
.af1rid
.afri1k
.afri1q
.af1ry
.af1sad
.af1skaa
.af1skil
.af1sme
.af1stiv
.afstøb1
.af1stø
.af1tal
.afta1le
.af1tar
.af1tat
.afte1de
.af1tels
.af1ter.
.af1tes
.af1the
.aftio1
.aft1n
.af1tog
.af1toi
.af1tone
.af1tre
.af1tva
.af1und.
.af1unds
.af1vl1
.afæn1
.af1æs
.ag1ae
.aga1i
.aga1l
.agar1
.age1de
.ag1ell
.agen1d
.age1ra.
.age1ra1n1
.age1re.
.age1red
.age1ren
.age1res
.age1ret
.ager1l
.age1s
.age1t
.ag1fo
.ag1ge
.agis1
.agi1tan
.agi1tu
.ag1led
.ag1lel
.ag1li
.agli1ge
.ag1me
.agme1t
.agmi1
.ag1nar
.ag1nen
.ag1ner
.ag1nes
.agne1ti
.agni1t
.ag1nor
.ag1nu
.ag1ore
.agran1d
.agree1i
.agre1em
.agro1s
.agréa1
.ags1
.agt1b
.ag1tc
.ag1ted
.ag1tel
.ag1tet
.ag1thi
.ag1ti
.agt1o
.agu1l
.agun1
.ahcen1
.ahe1r
.ah1in
.ah1li
.ahn1d
.ah1to
.aier1
.ai1gre1
.ai1gu
.aiin1
.aii1t
.ai1j
.aile1r
.ai1les
.aili1
.ail1l
.ai1man
.ai1me
.aina1
.aino1
.air1l
.ai1sanc
.ais1s
.ai1st
.ai1tat
.aite1ru
.ai1va
.aive1s
.ai1vet
.ajcrl1
.aj1n
.aj1te
.aken1
.aker1g
.aker1h
.aker1l
.aker1m
.ake1v
.ak1f
.ak1ie
.aki1m
.ak1kan
.ak1ks
.ak1lag
.ak1lan
.ak1le
.ak1n
.akobs1
.ako1s
.akre1
.akro1
.ak1sell
.ak1sen
.ak1set
.ak1sid
.ak1sk
.aks1st
.ak1ta
.ak1te
.ak2tene
.ak1ten
.akt1m
.akt1n
.ak1to
.akto1re
.ak1tue
.akt1ve
.ak1tø
.aktø1ra
.aktø1re
.ala1b
.alad1d
.ala1de
.al1af1h
.al1age
.al1ald
.alan1d
.ala1ne
.al1ann
.ala1ru
.ala1t
.alat1e
.al1baa
.al1bel
.al1bi1l
.al1bre
.al1bru
.albu1me
.1album
.al1bu1q
.al1can
.al1ce
.al1cid
.al1cle
.al1cri
.alc1t
.alcu1no
.al1cun
.al1das
.al1dc
.alde1l
.al1de1le
.al1di
.al1dn
.ald1ran
.al1drig
.al1dru
.al1dsl
.alds1s
.ale1d
.al1eel
.al1eer
.ale1g
.alei1
.al1ele
.al1ende
.ale1ne
.al1ene.
.aleni1
.ale1ns
.ale1re1
.aler1n
.al1ers
.ales1
.al1eun
.aleu1t
.al1fi
.al1fl
.al1fol
.al1fons
.al1fr
.al1gan
.alge1br
.al1gie
.al1giv
.al1gr
.al1hand
.al1he
.al1ho
.ali1am
.al1i1as
.al1iel
.al1ie1r
.ali1gl
.ali1is
.al1in2g.
.al1inn1
.alio1r
.ali1te
.ali1u
.aljor1
.al1kem
.al1ken
.alke1ne
.al1ker
.al1kos
.alk1r
.al1lai
.al1lan
.al1l1an.
.al1lar
.al1l1ar.
.alle1de
.alle1lt
.al1lelu
.al1l1e2m.
.al1len.
.al1le1n1d
.al1leri
.al1lern
.all1fo
.al1lid
.al1lier
.all1in1d
.al1ling
.al1lion
.al1l1i2s.
.alli1te1
.al1litt
.al1li1u
.al1lmes
.allo1ca
.allo1w1e
.al1low
.al1lo1wi
.al1l1u2m.
.al1lung
.al1lur
.allu1si
.all1ve
.al1læ
.al1magt
.al1mand
.al1mer
.alme1su
.al1min
.al1mn
.al1mu1en
.al1mue
.al1mue1v
.al1my
.al1nar
.al1nat
.al1nen
.al1nin
.al1nm
.al1nu
.al1on2g.
.alon1ge
.al1ore
.al1ori
.alou1
.al1pas
.al1pi1ne
.al1pin1s
.al1q
.al1raa
.al1red
.als1ak
.al1sen
.als1f
.al1sia
.al1sie
.al1sik
.al1sin
.al1ska
.al1ske
.al1skj
.al1skr
.als1ku
.al1sl
.al1ste
.al1str
.al1svæ
.al1sæ
.alt1ch
.al1tcre
.alt1d
.al1tee
.al1tem
.al1ten
.al1ter.
.alt1ete
.al1thi
.al1tid
.al1tinn
.al1tis
.alt1k
.al1tle
.alt1ma
.altm2
.al1tra
.alt1raa
.al1tre
.alt1re.
.al1tri
.alt1sa
.al1ttd
.alté1
.alu1t
.al1uu
.al1ven
.al1ver1
.alve1s
.al1vex
.al1vid
.al1vin
.al1vv
.al1vær
.al1ze
.ama1no
.ama1nu
.ama1ra
.am1arb
.ama1re
.ama1tu
.ama1v
.am1ban
.am1bas
.am1bie
.am1bio
.ambi1s
.am1bl
.am1bol
.am1bor
.am1bur
.am1d
.ame1k
.ame1na
.ame1ne
.ame1née
.am1erd
.ame1rif
.ame1s
.am1fin
.amge1
.am1gh
.ami1e
.ami1fe1
.amii1
.ami1l
.ami1na
.ami1ne
.am1ing
.amini1s
.amin1n
.ami1se
.am1la
.am1le
.amling1
.am1lin
.am1ma1l
.am1med
.ammel1e
.am1mel
.am2mera
.am1mer
.am1mia
.am1ming
.am1mum
.am1na
.am1ne
.am1ni
.amo1ni
.amo1re
.amo1rin
.am1ped
.am1per
.amphe1
.am1pho
.am1pla
.am1se
.ams1g
.ams1l
.ams1o
.am1ta
.am1ter
.amtid1e
.am1tid
.am1tii
.amt1in
.amt1l
.amt1man
.1amt1mcm
.amt1ml
.amt1r
.amt1str
.am1unde
.amu1ni1
.amu1t
.amyn1
.am1z
.amé1l
.améri1
.ana1de
.an1aen
.an1aga
.ana1im
.an1aiv
.an1and
.an1are
.an1ari
.an1att
.an1beg
.an1bei
.an1ben
.an1bli
.anc1a
.an1cef
.an1ces1
.anci1p
.an1cir
.an1cke
.an1clr
.an1col
.anc1t
.and1all
.an1dan
.an1dara
.an1das
.and1ast
.anda1v
.andc1re
.ande1d
.ande1f
.an1dei
.an1dela
.an1de1le
.ande1ru
.an1d1et.
.an1de1te
.an1dhe
.an1dic
.an1die
.and1ing
.and1ir
.an1dis
.an1dit
.and1le
.andled1
.and1li
.an1dng
.an1do
.and1p
.an1d1ra.
.an1dras
.an1d1re.
.an1dred
.and1reg
.an1d1rel
.an1drer
.an1dres
.an1d1ro.
.an1drop
.an1d1ru
.and1sa
.and1sen1
.ands1f
.and1sk
.an1dsn
.an1dst.
.and1ta
.an1dte.
.and1tes
.an1dti
.andt1l
.an1dtt
.and1v
.an1d1øy
.an1ea
.ane1de
.an1eel
.ane1en
.an1eer
.an1eie
.an1eis
.ane1li
.anel1s
.an1enb
.ane1ne
.an1ere
.ane1ren
.an1ern
.an1ero
.an1ers
.an1est.
.an1et
.an1fall
.an1fan
.an1far
.an1fch
.anfd1ra
.an1fel
.an1fes
.an1fet
.an1ffe
.an1fie
.an1fp
.an1fre
.anfs1re
.an1fsrt
.an1fta
.an1fte
.an1gaa
.an1gaa1n2
.an1gab
.an1gaf
.an1gal
.an1gand
.an1gang
.an1gas
.an1gav
.an1gels
.ang1end
.ange1ne
.an2ge1ns
.an1ger.
.ange1re
.an1get.
.an1gik
.an1gin
.an1gis
.an1git
.an1gjce
.an1gje
.an1gjo
.ang1len
.an1glet
.an1g1lia
.an1gloi
.an1glos
.an1gme
.an1gre
.an1g1re.
.an1gry
.an1gsl
.an1gstp
.an1gte
.an1gtn
.an1gtr
.an1gui
.angu1lu
.an1hall
.an1hor
.an1hål
.an1ian
.ani1c
.an1iel
.an1iet
.an1ik
.ani1me
.ani1mi
.ani1mo.
.an1inc
.an1ine
.an1in2g.
.anin1ga
.an1in1ge
.an1ings
.an1inn
.an1ita
.an1iu
.an1iv
.an1je
.an1kan
.ankebe1
.anke1e
.anke1p
.an1ker1b
.ank1in
.an1klan
.an1kn
.an1kom
.an1kren
.ank1ret
.ank1ri
.an1ks
.an1land
.an1lat
.an1lcr
.an1leb
.anleb1n
.an1ledi
.an1lee
.anleg1n
.an1leg
.an1leh
.an1lei
.an1len.
.an1ler
.an1les
.an1let
.an1lin
.an1llt
.an1lo
.anlobs1
.an1lob
.an1lr
.anma1ni
.an1mark
.an1men
.an1mi
.an1mår
.ann1ad.
.an1na1le
.an1nan
.an1n1an.
.an1n1ar.
.an1n1are
.an1n1at.
.ann1de
.anne1b
.an1nes
.annet2t
.an1net
.an1nex1g
.ann1f
.an1nge
.anni1b
.an1niba
.an1nik
.an1nis
.an1nit
.an1n1l
.anno1rn
.anns1m
.an1nto
.an1nun
.an1oe
.an1og
.an1ol
.an1op
.an1ora
.an1org
.anor1ga1
.an1oru
.an1ov
.an1par
.an1pl
.an1pri
.an1qu
.an1raa
.an1rec
.an1ren
.an1saa
.an1sam
.an1san
.an1sat
.an1sce
.an1sch
.an1sed
.an1see
.anseen1
.an1sege
.an1seh
.an1sel
.an1s1en.
.an1ses
.an1set
.an1sia
.an1sii
.an1sin
.an1sir
.an1sit
.an1ska
.an1sko
.an1skr
.an1slag
.an1sle
.an1slu
.ans1m
.an1soe
.an1so1ka
.an1som
.an1son
.an1spo
.an1spre
.an1ssaa
.ans1san
.an1ssr
.an1stat
.an1ste
.an1stim
.an1stn
.an1stri
.an1stræ
.an1stun
.an1sty
.an1stø
.an1su
.an1sv
.an1tak
.an1ta1l1e
.an1talt
.antan1d
.an1tant
.antarc1
.an1tas
.an1tat.
.an1tb
.an1tcr
.an1t1ea
.an1tem1
.an1ten
.an2te1re
.an1ter
.an1ter1l
.an1tet
.an1thc
.an1the
.anti1co
.an1tien
.anti1hæ
.an1ting1
.an1tle
.an1tll
.an1to2g.
.an1tom
.an1too
.an1tor
.an1tre
.an1tre1d
.an1tri
.an1tro.
.an1trum
.ant1woo
.an1ue
.an1une
.an1væ
.an1wal
.an1zet
.an1zuri
.anzu1r
.an1ås
.ao1g
.aområ1
.ao1v
.aove1
.apa1c
.apa1n
.ap1aren
.apel1
.aper1tu
.ap1fch
.apha1
.aphe1
.apho1
.apio1
.api1t
.apla1
.ap2or1
.apost1l
.ap1pea
.ap1pel
.appre1c
.ap1pres
.ap1prou
.appro1v
.appé1t
.ap1re1l
.ap1st
.ap1tu
.apt1ur
.ap1ue
.apy1
.aqe1
.ara1be
.ara1d
.ar1ae
.ara1h
.ar1ang
.ar1arb
.ara1tio
.arato1r
.ara1tr
.ar1aut
.ar1bar
.arbe1te
.ar1be
.arbo1re
.ar1bun
.arcbi1
.arc1d
.ar1chae1
.ar1che
.ar1cke
.ar1clii1
.arc1tic
.ar1dan
.ar1ded
.ar1dei
.ar1del
.ar1der
.ar1des
.ar1din
.ar1do
.ar1dr
.ar1dsc
.ar1dsj
.ar1dt
.ar1e1al.
.are1ale
.ar1e1as
.are1d
.are1f
.ar1eh
.ar1eid
.are1na
.ar1ena.
.are1na1e
.aren1d
.ar1e1ne
.arent1
.are1t
.areti1
.ar1fa
.arfar1
.arf1j
.1ar1geh
.ar1gen
.ar1ge1s
.ar1gj
.ar1gr
.arg1s
.ar1gue
.ar1gu2m.
.ar1he
.arhun1
.ari1al
.aria1ni
.ar1ibi
.ari1d
.ar1ien
.arie1te
.ari1fi
.ar1ina
.ar1inen
.ari1ner
.ari1sc
.ari1se
.ar1ite
.ark1s
.ar1ler
.ar1les
.ar1lig
.ar1lin
.ar1lo
.ar1mam
.ar1m1ane
.ar1mar
.arm1ar.
.ar1m1ed.
.ar1mee.
.ar1me1en
.ar1meer
.1ar1mera1
.ar1mere
.arme1ri
.armi1g
.ar1mil
.ar1mis1
.armi1st
.ar1mod
.ar1moe
.ar1mos
.ar1mu
.ar1mé1en
.ar1nal
.ar1narn
.arne1b
.ar1nen
.ar1ne2s.
.ar1net
.arn1f
.arn1h
.ar1nie
.arn1m
.aron1
.ar1pe
.ar1pi
.ar1rad
.ar1ras
.ar1red
.ar1rek
.ar1rene
.ar1rep
.ar1rete
.ar1r1he
.ar1riu
.arri1va
.arri1ve
.arri1vé
.ar1rn
.arro1g
.ar1réte
.ar1sa1k
.ar1sc
.ars1k
.ar1so
.ars1ta
.ar1ste
.arstel1
.ars1v
.ar1ta1n
.ar1tar
.art1b
.ar1ted
.arte1ne
.ar1ten
.ar1ter1n
.ar1tes
.ar1tet
.ar1thu
.ar1tib
.ar1tich
.ar1tig1h
.ar1ti1kc
.ar1tikk
.ar1tin
.arti1sa
.ar1tist
.ar1tit
.art1l
.art1m
.arts1e
.artsom1
.arts1sa
.arts1v
.ar1tu
.ar1tø
.artøy1
.ar1té
.ar1var1
.ar1vcr
.arve1de
.arve1fø
.ar1ves1d
.ar1vese
.ar1vil
.ar1wi
.as1alf
.asbe1t
.as1cent
.as1cr
.as1cu
.as1de
.asde1l
.asdru1
.asek1
.ase1l
.as1fat
.as1fe
.as1fo
.as1ge
.as1gje
.as1hin
.asi1en
.asi1n
.as1je
.aska1
.as1k1ed.
.as1ken.
.as1ker.
.aske1s
.ask1in
.as1kje
.as1lag
.as1læ
.as1maa
.as1ma1le
.as1man1
.as1mo1na
.as1mor
.as1na
.as1pec
.as1pl
.as1q
.assem1
.as1sere
.as1set
.as1sin
.as1ska
.as1sni
.as1sp
.as1stan
.as1sti
.as1str
.aste1h
.as1ten
.astens1
.as1tie
.as1tri
.ast1rid
.as1tru
.as1try
.astset1
.as1tum
.as1tun
.as1tv
.asu1s
.as1ven1
.as1w
.at1ba
.at1beta
.at1br
.at1by
.at1del1
.at1di
.atema1
.aten1a1
.at1end
.ater1h
.ater1v
.at1fa
.at1fe
.at1fin
.atha1l
.at1han.
.at1hann
.at1hol1
.ati1on
.at1ir
.atis1
.ati1t
.ati1v
.ati1ø
.at1kj
.at1kom
.at1kor
.at1ku
.at1las
.at1led1
.at1læ
.atne1d
.at1ni
.at1nol
.ato1ni
.ato1r
.ato1v
.at1rad
.at1rek
.at1rig1
.at1rin
.atro1f
.at1saa
.at1sat
.at1se
.at1sid
.at1sig
.at1ska
.at1skr
.at1sl
.at1sn
.at1so
.atspre1
.at1ste
.at1sti
.at1sv
.at1tai
.at1tak
.atta1qu
.at1tcr
.atte1a
.at1tef
.at1tel
.att1enb
.at1tene
.at1tent
.at1tet
.att1g
.at1th
.at1tie
.at1tik
.at1tis
.attitu1
.at1tje1
.at1t1om
.at1ton
.att1um
.at1tur
.at1vin
.at1væ
.at1zu
.atå1
.aual1l
.au1ber
.au1bl
.au1cia
.au1co
.auc1ti
.au1dea
.au1deb
.au1def
.au1del
.au1der
.au1det
.au1dev
.au1dic
.au1difl
.au1dite
.au1di1tø
.au1dor
.au1dr
.auer1r
.auf1lod
.au1for
.au1fsr
.au1gen
.auge1st
.au1g1um
.au1hel
.auk1ana
.au1ken
.au1ki
.au1la
.au1lem
.au1lie
.au1lin
.au1lu
.au1mo
.au1pe
.au1qu
.au1ran
.aur1d
.aure1am
.au1rei
.au1ren
.au1ret
.au1reu
.au1rie
.au1roi
.aus1ar
.1aus1gea
.aus1hal
.au1sie
.au1sir
.au1ski
.aus1kom
.aus1lo
